Connecticut, session 2026, HB05542.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 53a-107 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A person is guilty of criminal trespass in the first degree when: (1)
Knowing that such person is not licensed or privileged to do so, such
person enters or remains in a building or any other premises after an
order to leave or not to enter personally communicated to such person
by the owner of the premises or other authorized person; or (2) such
person enters or remains in a building or any other premises in violation
of a restraining order issued pursuant to section 46b-15 or a protective
order issued pursuant to section 46b-16a, 46b-38c, 54-1k or 54-82r by the
Superior Court; or (3) such person enters or remains in a building or any
other premises in violation of a foreign order of protection, as defined
in section 46b-15a, that has been issued against such person in a case
involving the use, attempted use or threatened use of physical force
HB5542 / File No. 632 1

HB5542 File No. 632
against another person; or (4) knowing that such person is not licensed
or privileged to do so, such person enters or remains on public land,
including on school grounds and any parking lot or athletic field or in
any school building on such grounds, after an order to leave or not to
enter personally communicated to such person by an authorized official
of the state, [or] a municipality or a local or regional board of education,
as the case may be.
(b) Criminal trespass in the first degree is a class A misdemeanor.
Sec. 2. Section 53a-108 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A person is guilty of criminal trespass in the second degree when,
knowing that such person is not licensed or privileged to do so, (1) such
person enters or remains in a building, including a school building, or
(2) such person enters or remains on public land, including on school
grounds and any parking lot or athletic field on such grounds.
(b) Criminal trespass in the second degree is a class B misdemeanor.
Sec. 3. Section 53a-109 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A person is guilty of criminal trespass in the third degree when,
knowing that such person is not licensed or privileged to do so: (1) Such
person enters or remains in premises which are posted in a manner
prescribed by law or reasonably likely to come to the attention of
intruders or are fenced or otherwise enclosed in a manner designed to
exclude intruders, or which belong to the state and are appurtenant to
any state institution, including a state-operated school building or on
such school grounds and any parking lot or athletic field on such school
grounds; or (2) such person enters or remains in any premises for the
purpose of hunting, trapping or fishing; or (3) such person enters or
remains on public land, including on school grounds and any parking
lot or athletic field or in any school building on such grounds, which is
posted in a manner prescribed by law or reasonably likely to come to
HB5542 / File No. 632 2

HB5542 File No. 632
the attention of intruders or is fenced or otherwise enclosed in a manner
designed to exclude intruders.
(b) Criminal trespass in the third degree is a class C misdemeanor,
except that any person found guilty under subdivision (2) of subsection
(a) of this section shall be guilty of a class B misdemeanor and fined not
less than five hundred nor more than one thousand dollars.
Sec. 4. Section 53a-110a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A person is guilty of simple trespass when, knowing that such
person is not licensed or privileged to do so, such person enters or
remains in or on any premises without intent to harm any property,
including on school grounds and any parking lot or athletic field or in
any school building on such grounds.
(b) Simple trespass is an infraction.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 53a-107
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 53a-108
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 53a-109
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026 53a-110a
JUD Joint Favorable
HB5542 / File No. 632 3

HB5542 File No. 632
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill makes clarifying changes to the state's trespass statutes,
resulting in no fiscal impact.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5542 / File No. 632 4

HB5542 File No. 632
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5542
AN ACT CONCERNING CRIMINAL AND SIMPLE TRESPASS ON
SCHOOL GROUNDS OR IN SCHOOL BUILDINGS.